Washington statutes.
RCW 9.12.010

Barratry.

Every person who brings on his or her own behalf, or instigates, incites, or encourages another to bring, any false suit at law or in equity in any court of this state, with intent thereby to distress or harass a defendant in the suit, or who serves or sends any paper or document purporting to be or resembling a judicial process, that is not in fact a judicial process, is guilty of a misdemeanor; and in case the person offending is an attorney, he or she may, in addition thereto be disbarred from practicing law within this state.

[ 2001 c 310 s 3. Prior: 1995 c 285 s 27; 1915 c 165 s 1; 1909 c 249 s 118; Code 1881 s 901; 1873 p 204 s 100; 1854 p 92 s 91; RRS s 2370.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Effective date—2001 c 310: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Effective date—1995 c 285: See RCW 48.30A.900.

Attorneys-at-law: Chapter 2.44 RCW.

State bar act: Chapter 2.48 RCW.